Utah statutes.
10-6-125.   Transfer of appropriation balance between departments in same fund.

At the request of the budget officer or upon its own initiative, the governing body by resolution may transfer any unencumbered or unexpended appropriation balance or portion thereof from one department in a fund to another within the same fund, provided that no appropriation for debt retirement and interest, reduction of deficit, or other appropriation required by law or ordinance shall be reduced below the minimums required.



Enacted by Chapter 26, 1979 General Session

